Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2602
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Competitive Livestock Markets Act:

(1) Animal unit means one head of cattle, three calves under four hundred fifty pounds, or five swine;

(2) Contract swine operation means a livestock operation in which swine owned or controlled by a packer are produced according to a written agreement that does not contain a confidentiality clause and that is agreed to by the packer and a person other than the packer who owns, leases, or holds a legal interest in the livestock operation;

(3) Department means the Department of Agriculture;

(4) Director means the Director of Agriculture or his or her designee;

(5) Livestock means live cattle or swine;

(6) Livestock operation means a location, including buildings, land, lots, yard corrals, and improvements, adapted to and utilized for the purpose of feeding, keeping, or otherwise providing for the care and maintenance of livestock;

(7) Packer means a person, or agent of such person, engaged in the business of slaughtering livestock in Nebraska in excess of one hundred fifty thousand animal units per year; and

(8) Person includes individuals, firms, associations, limited liability companies, and corporations and officers or limited liability company members thereof.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB176, § 2.